Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6913
Network plan, defined.

Network plan means health insurance coverage offered by a health carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care including items and services paid for as medical care are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the health carrier.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 13.